Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 6 LOCAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS - COUNTIES
30-20-604.5. District sales tax.

The board of any county or of any city that has been authorized to become a city and county pursuant to an amendment to the state constitution that has been approved by the registered electors of the state of Colorado and that subsequently becomes a city and county for the purpose of funding all or a portion of the cost of any improvements constructed or transportation services provided pursuant to section 30-20-603 (1)(a), (1)(a.5), and (1)(c), may levy a sales tax throughout the district upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales tax is authorized pursuant to section 29-2-105; except that such tax may be levied only upon those transactions specified in section 39-26-104 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(e), and (1)(f). The board may, in its discretion, levy or continue to levy a sales tax on the sales of low-emitting motor vehicles, power sources, or parts used for converting such power sources as specified in section 39-26-719 (1).

The tax shall be collected, administered, and enforced, to the extent feasible, pursuant to section 29-2-106, C.R.S. The department of revenue shall retain an amount not to exceed the net incremental cost of such collection, administration, and enforcement and shall transmit such amount to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the districtwide sales tax fund, which fund is hereby created; except that in no event shall:

Any district formed prior to or on July 1, 1993, pay in any given fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 1994, more than an amount equal to the amount paid by the district in the 1993-94 fiscal year, as adjusted in accordance with changes in the consumer price index for the Denver-Boulder consolidated metropolitan statistical area;

Any district formed after July 1, 1993, pay in any given fiscal year commencing after the first full fiscal year of operation more than an amount equal to the amount paid by the district in the first full fiscal year of operation, as adjusted in accordance with changes in the consumer price index for the Denver-Boulder consolidated metropolitan statistical area.

A qualified purchaser may provide a direct payment permit number issued pursuant to section 39-26-103.5, C.R.S., to any vendor or retailer that is liable and responsible for collecting and remitting any district sales tax imposed on any sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to the provisions of this section. A vendor or retailer who has received in good faith from a qualified purchaser a direct payment permit number shall not be liable or responsible for collection and remittance of any sales tax imposed on such sale that is paid for directly from such qualified purchaser's funds and not the personal funds of any individual.

A qualified purchaser that provides a direct payment permit number to a vendor or retailer shall be liable and responsible for the amount of sales tax imposed on any sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to this section in the same manner as liability would be imposed on a qualified purchaser for state sales tax pursuant to section 39-26-105 (5).

The general assembly shall appropriate annually from the districtwide sales tax fund to the department of revenue the amount necessary for the department's collection, administration, and enforcement of the districtwide sales tax. Any moneys remaining in said fund attributable to districtwide sales taxes collected in the prior fiscal year shall be transmitted to the county which established the district for which a districtwide sales tax has been levied; except that, prior to the transmission to the county of such moneys, any moneys appropriated from the general fund to the department of revenue for collection, administration, and enforcement of a districtwide sales tax shall be repaid.

The tax authorized by this section shall not exceed one percent.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), a proposal for a districtwide sales tax shall be referred to the registered electors of the county who reside within the boundaries of the district, either by resolution of the board or by petition initiated and signed by five percent of the registered electors who reside within the boundaries of the district.
(4) (a) (I) Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), a proposal for a districtwide sales tax shall be referred to the registered electors of the county who reside within the boundaries of the district, either by resolution of the board or by petition initiated and signed by five percent of the registered electors who reside within the boundaries of the district.

In a district formed prior to December 31, 2002, by a city that has been authorized to become a city and county pursuant to an amendment to the state constitution that has been approved by the registered electors of the state of Colorado, a proposal for a districtwide sales tax shall be referred to the electors of the district, either by resolution of the board or by petition initiated and signed by five percent of the electors of the district.

Such proposal shall contain a description of the proposed tax, including its purposes, and shall state the amount of tax to be imposed.

Any election held under this section shall conform to the requirements of section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution.

Except as provided in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (II), upon its being presented with a petition requesting a proposal for such sales tax, the board, upon certification of the signatures on the petition, shall submit such proposal to the registered electors residing within the district.

In a district formed prior to December 31, 2002, by a city that has been authorized to become a city and county pursuant to an amendment to the state constitution that has been approved by the registered electors of the state of Colorado, the board, after being presented with a petition requesting a proposal for such sales tax and upon certification of the signatures on the petition, shall submit such proposal to the electors of the district.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 516, § 14, effective April 30, 1999.)

Except as provided in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (I), if approved by a majority of the registered electors voting thereon, the sales tax shall become effective as provided in section

29-2-106 (2)

, C.R.S.
(e) (I) (A) Except as provided in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (I), if approved by a majority of the registered electors voting thereon, the sales tax shall become effective as provided in section

29-2-106 (2)

, C.R.S.

In a district formed prior to December 31, 2002, by a city that has been authorized to become a city and county pursuant to an amendment to the state constitution that has been approved by the registered electors of the state of Colorado, if the proposal is approved by a majority of the electors of the district voting thereon, the sales tax shall become effective as provided in section 29-2-106 (2), C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 516, § 14, effective April 30, 1999.)

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (5), all revenue collected from such sales tax, except the amounts retained under subsection (2) of this section, shall be credited to a special fund designated as the sales tax street improvement fund, such designation to include the name or description of the district. The fund shall be used only to pay the costs of the district improvements authorized by section 30-20-603 (1)(a) and (1)(c), the costs of debt service on bonds issued pursuant to section 30-20-619 (4), if any, or both of such costs.

In a district formed prior to December 31, 2002, by a city that has been authorized to become a city and county pursuant to an amendment to the state constitution that has been approved by the registered electors of the state of Colorado, all revenue collected from such sales tax, except the amounts retained under subsection (2) of this section, shall be credited to a special fund designated as the sales tax street improvement fund, such designation to include the name or description of the district. The fund shall be used only to pay the costs of the district improvements and transportation services authorized by section 30-20-603 (1)(a.5) and (1)(c), the costs of debt service on bonds issued pursuant to section 30-20-619 (4), if any, the costs of operations, maintenance, and replacement, and the costs of organization of the district.

When the total cost of the improvements constructed pursuant to section 30-20-603 (1)(a), including the cost of all debt service thereon, if any, has been paid, the board shall cease to levy and collect the sales tax originally imposed pursuant to this section and shall repeal the ordinance authorizing such tax.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (6), if an improvement includes the use of sales tax for the improvement's operation or maintenance, the board shall continue to levy and collect the sales tax as specified in the resolution authorizing such tax.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 30-20-602 (2), if any territory within a district is annexed by or incorporated into a municipality and revenue bonds have been issued pursuant to section 30-20-619 (4) prior to the date of such annexation or incorporation, the levy of the sales tax authorized by this section shall continue in such annexed or incorporated territory until the later of:

The date upon which no bonds remain outstanding, whether issued before, on, or after the date of annexation or incorporation, so long as such bonds are refunding bonds or such bonds are issued for improvements which were authorized as of the date of annexation or incorporation; or

The date of completion of all improvements which were authorized for such district as of the date of annexation or incorporation.

The provisions of this subsection (7), as amended, shall apply to any territory within a district which has been annexed by or incorporated into a municipality, regardless of the date of annexation or incorporation.

Notwithstanding subsection (7) of this section, that portion of the sales tax authorized by this section that is used for the operation or maintenance of improvements constructed pursuant to section 30-20-603 (1) shall not apply to any territory within a district that has been annexed by or incorporated into a municipality.

The board may appoint an independent board of directors to perform the functions of the board under this part 6 in a district providing transportation services and improvements in accordance with the terms of the resolution or ordinance establishing the district.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provisions of this part 6 relating to the assessment of local improvement costs upon the property in a district that benefits from such improvements shall not apply to any district formed prior to December 31, 2002, by a city that has been authorized to become a city and county pursuant to an amendment to the state constitution that has been approved by the registered electors of the state of Colorado and that levies a sales tax pursuant to this section to fund local improvements authorized by section 30-20-603 (1)(a.5) and (1)(c).

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1211, § 5, effective May 7.

L. 92:

(7) amended, p. 962, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 318, § 3, effective March 29.

L. 99:

(1), (4), (5), and (6) amended and (8) added, p. 516, § 14, effective April 30; (1) amended, p. 983, § 9, effective May 28; (2)(a.5) added, p. 14, § 6, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2000:

(1), (4)(a), (4)(c)(II), (4)(e)(I), and (5) amended and (9) and (10) added, p. 1991, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1039, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 1460, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 992, § 11, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1243), ch. 385, p. 1802, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1295), ch. 314, p. 1655, § 11, effective July 1, 2014.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1240), ch. 264, p. 2502, § 10, effective June 1.

L. 2022:

(2)(a.5)(II) amended, (HB 22-1312), ch. 202, p. 1359, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 99-1159 and House Bill 99-1271 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 314, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

30-20-605. Property of irregular form - assessment.

Whenever any lot or parcel of land is V-shaped or of any irregular form, such allowance may be made by resolution in any assessment as may be equitable and just, or any allowance may be refused, and, in case of any unusual area or proportion of intersections, the county may pay not exceeding one-half of the cost of any such intersection, and in such case the remainder only shall be assessed against the property improved.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 486, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-5.

30-20-606. Determination of special benefits - factors considered.

The term "benefit", for the purposes of assessing a particular property within an improvement district, particularly with respect to drainage improvements to carry off surface waters, includes, but is not limited to, the following:

Any increase in the market value of the property;

The provision for accepting the burden from specific dominant property for discharging surface water onto servient property in a manner or quantity greater than would naturally flow because the dominant owner made some of his property impermeable;

Any adaptability of property to a superior or more profitable use;

Any alleviation of health and sanitation hazards accruing to particular property or accruing to public property in the improvement district if the provision of health and sanitation is paid for wholly or partially out of funds derived from taxation of property owners of the improvement district;

Any reduction in the maintenance costs of particular property or accruing to public property in the improvement district if the maintenance of the public property is paid for wholly or partially out of funds derived from taxation of property owners of the improvement district;

Any increase in convenience or reduction in inconvenience accruing to particular property owners, including the facilitation of access to and travel over streets, roads, and highways;

Recreational improvements accruing to particular property owners as a direct result of drainage improvement.

As used in connection with any district formed for the purpose of encouraging, accommodating, and financing improvements as authorized in section 30-20-603 (11.5), the term "benefit" shall include, but not be limited to, any acknowledged value set forth in the contracts and agreements entered into by the owner of the assessed property.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 997, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2) added, p. 1297, § 13, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-605.5 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-607. Statement of expenses - apportionment.

Upon completion of any local improvement or upon completion from time to time of any part thereof and upon acceptance thereof by the board or whenever the total cost of any improvement or of any such part thereof can be reasonably ascertained either prior to, during, or subsequent to the construction of the improvements, the board shall cause to be prepared a statement showing the whole cost of the improvement, including costs of inspection and collection, capitalized interest on any bonds issued for such period as the board may deem necessary, capitalized bond reserves, and all other incidental costs, the portion thereof, if any, to be paid by assessments, the portion thereof, if any, to be paid through the sales tax imposed pursuant to section 30-20-604.5, the portion thereof, if any, to be paid by the county, and the portion thereof to be assessed upon each lot or tract of land to be assessed for the same, which statement shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder. If the board should deem the basis of assessment to be inequitable in any case, a just and equitable assessment shall be made upon the basis of benefits accruing to any property assessed by reason of the improvements made.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 486, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-6.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1073, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1058, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1213, § 6, effective May 7.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-606 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-608. Notice of apportionment.

Upon receipt of the statement filed pursuant to section 30-20-607, the county clerk and recorder shall notify, by advertisement once in some newspaper of general circulation in said county, the owners of any property to be assessed that said improvements have been, or are about to be, completed and accepted, therein specifying:

The whole cost of the improvement;

The portion, if any, to be paid by such county and the portion, if any, to be paid from a districtwide sales tax;

The share, if any, apportioned to each lot or tract of land;

That any complaints or objections which may be made in writing by the owners to the board of county commissioners, and filed in the office of the clerk within twenty days from the publication of such notice, will be heard and determined by the said board before the passage of any resolution assessing the cost of said improvements; and

The date when and place where such complaints or objections will be heard.

Any district formed for the purpose of encouraging, accommodating, and financing improvements as authorized in section 30-20-603 (11.5) shall not be required to provide a notice of apportionment by publication; rather, such notice, if any, may be provided in the time and manner set forth in the contract or agreement entered into for each property included in the district.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 486, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-7.

L. 87:

IP(1), (1)(b), and (1)(c) amended, p. 1213, § 7, effective May 7.

L. 2008:

(2) added, p. 1297, § 14, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-607 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-609. Hearing on objections.

Except for a district formed for the purposes authorized in section 30-20-603 (11.5), at the time specified in the notice required pursuant to section 30-20-608 (1) or at some adjourned time, the board shall hear and determine all such complaints and objections and may make such modifications and changes as may seem equitable and just or may confirm the first apportionment. The board shall, by resolution, assess the cost of the improvements, and the passage of the resolution shall be prima facie evidence of the fact that the property assessed is benefited in the amount of the assessments and that the assessments have been lawfully levied.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 487, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-8.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1058, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-100), ch. 207, p. 902, § 3, effective May 5.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-608 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-610. Assessment constitutes a lien - filing with county clerk and recorder - corrections.

All assessments made in pursuance of this part 6, together with all interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs in collecting the same shall constitute, from the effective date of the assessing resolution, a perpetual lien in the several amounts assessed against each lot or tract of land and shall have priority over all other liens excepting general tax liens. As to any subdivisions of any land assessed in pursuance of this part 6, the assessment lien may be apportioned by the board in such manner, if any, as may be provided in the assessing resolution.

The county clerk and recorder shall file with his office copies of the assessing resolution after its final adoption by the board for recording on the land records of each lot or tract of land assessed within the county, as provided in article 30, article 35, or article 36 of title 38, C.R.S. In addition, the county clerk and recorder shall file copies of such assessing resolution after its final adoption by the board with the county assessor and the county treasurer. The county assessor is authorized to create separate schedules for each lot or tract of land assessed within the county pursuant to such resolution.

No delays, mistakes, errors, or irregularities in any act or proceeding authorized or required by this part 6 shall prejudice or invalidate any final assessment; but the same may be remedied by subsequent filings, amending acts, or proceedings, as the case may require. When so remedied, the same shall take effect as of the date of the original filing, act, or proceeding. If in any court of competent jurisdiction any final assessment made in pursuance of this part 6 is set aside or if for any other reason the board determines it to be necessary to alter any final assessment made pursuant to this part 6, the board, upon notice as required in the making of an original assessment, may make a new assessment in accordance with the provisions of this part 6.

To provide for unanticipated increases in the costs of improvements, the amount of any assessment imposed before the completion of the related improvements may be increased to a total amount not in excess of the special benefit conferred upon the affected property if, not more than ninety days following the completion of such improvements, the board gives notice of its intent to consider the amendment of such assessment, stating the time and place that a public hearing shall be held thereon, and holds such public hearing, in the same manner as provided for hearings held pursuant to sections 30-20-608 and 30-20-609. At the conclusion of such public hearing, the board may determine whether to amend one or more assessments within a district. Any such amendment shall take effect as of the date of the original assessment.

If, as the result of any subdivision, resubdivision, vacation of right-of-way, or other action taken subsequent to the adoption of the assessment resolution, any new lot or parcel is created within a district, the board may, without a public hearing and with the consent of the owner of the new lot or parcel, modify the assessment resolution to reapportion all or any part of the total amount assessed in the district to such new lot or parcel.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 487, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-9.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1073, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1056, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2) amended, p. 1432, § 17, effective June 11.

L. 90:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1471, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2008:

(4) and (5) added, p. 1297, § 15, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-609 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-611. Assessment roll.

The county clerk and recorder, or such other officer or agent of the county as may be directed by the board in the preliminary order, shall prepare a local assessment roll in book form showing, in suitable columns, each piece of land assessed, the total amount of assessment, the amount of each installment of principal and interest if, in pursuance of this part 6, the same is payable in installments, and the date when each installment will become due, with suitable columns for use, in case of payment of the whole amount or of any installment or penalty, and he shall deliver the same, duly certified, under the county seal, to the county treasurer for collection.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 487, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-10.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1073, § 4, effective May 24.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1059, § 29, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-610 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-612. When assessments payable - installments.

All special assessments for local improvements shall be due and payable within thirty days after the effective date of the assessing resolution without demand, but all such assessments may be paid, at the election of the owner, in installments with interest as provided in section 30-20-614. All special assessments for local improvements authorized in section 30-20-603 (11.5) may be due and payable at such alternate time or times as set forth in the assessing resolution.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 487, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-11.

L. 75:

(2) repealed, p. 1000, § 1, effective June 16.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1298, § 16, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-611 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-613. Effect of payment in installments.

Failure to pay the whole assessment within said period of thirty days shall be conclusively considered and held to be an election on the part of all persons interested, whether under disability or otherwise, to pay in such installments. All persons so electing to pay in installments shall be conclusively held and considered as consenting to said improvements. Such election shall be conclusively held and considered as a waiver of any right to question the power or jurisdiction of the county to construct the improvements, the quality of the work, the regularity or sufficiency of the proceedings, the validity or the correctness of the assessments, or the validity of the lien thereof; except that, with respect to local improvements authorized in section 30-20-603 (11.5), the owner for each property included in the district shall retain all rights otherwise existing by contract or by law against parties other than the county with respect to the financed energy efficiency improvement or renewable energy improvement.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 488, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-12.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1298, § 17, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-612 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-614. How installments paid - interest.

In case of such election to pay in installments, the assessments shall be payable in two or more installments of principal, the first of which installments shall be payable as prescribed by the board in not more than five years and the last in not more than twenty years, with interest in all cases on the unpaid principal. The number and amounts of payment of installments, the period of payment, and the rate and times of payment of interest shall be determined by the board and set forth in the assessing resolution. The times of payment of installments shall be the same as the times of payment for installments of property taxes as specified in section 39-10-104.5 (2), C.R.S.; except that all special assessments for local improvements authorized in section 30-20-603 (11.5) may be payable at such alternate times as provided by the board in the assessing resolution and the board may enter into agreements with third parties to assist the treasurer with the administration and collection of such installments.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 488, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-13.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1074, § 5, effective May 24.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1059, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1472, § 3, effective October 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2184, § 63, effective June 2.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1298, § 18, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-613 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-615. Penalty for default - payment of balance.

Failure to pay any installment, whether of principal or interest, when due shall cause the whole of the unpaid principal to become due and collectible immediately, and the whole amount of the unpaid principal and accrued interest shall thereafter draw interest at the rate established pursuant to section 5-12-106 (2) and (3), C.R.S., until the day of sale; but, at any time prior to the day of sale, the owner may pay the amount of all unpaid installments, with interest at the penalty rate set by the assessing resolution, and all costs of collection accrued and shall thereupon be restored to the right thereafter to pay in installments in the same manner as if default had not been suffered. The owner of any property not in default as to any installment or payment may, at any time, pay the whole of the unpaid principal with the interest accruing to the maturity of the next installment of interest or principal; except that any owner who pays the whole of the unpaid balance pursuant to this section may be assessed a prepayment premium not to exceed three percent of the unpaid principal, the amount of which premium shall be specified in the resolution imposing the assessment.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 488, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-14.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1074, § 6, effective May 24.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1056, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 269, § 8, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-614 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-616. Payment in full - assessment roll returned - payment of share.

Except for a district formed for the purposes authorized in section 30-20-603 (11.5), as to which the assessments shall be paid pursuant to the contracts and agreements entered into by the owner of the assessed property, payment may be made to the county treasurer at any time within thirty days after the effective date of the assessing resolution. At the expiration of said thirty-day period, the county treasurer shall return the local assessment roll to the county clerk and recorder, therein showing all payments made thereon, with the date of each payment. The county clerk and recorder shall certify the roll under the seal of the county and deliver it to the county treasurer, with the clerk's warrant for the collection of the same. The county treasurer shall provide a receipt for the roll, and all such rolls shall be numbered for convenient reference.

The owner of any divided or undivided interest in the property assessed may pay his share of any assessment, upon producing evidence of the extent of his interest, satisfactory to the treasurer having the roll in charge; but the assessment lien shall remain on the entire property assessed until the entire assessment is paid, except as otherwise provided pursuant to section 30-20-610.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 488, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-15.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1450, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2) amended, p. 1074, § 7, effective May 24.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (SB 10-100), ch. 207, p. 902, § 4, effective May 5.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-615 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-617. Sale of property for nonpayment - county may purchase property on default.

In case of default in the payment of any installment of principal or interest when due, the county treasurer shall advertise and sell all property concerning which such default is suffered for the payment of the whole of the unpaid assessments thereon. Said advertisements and sales shall be made at the same times, in the same manner, under all the same conditions and penalties, and with the same effect as provided by general law for sales of real estate in default of payment of the general property tax.

At any sale by the county treasurer of any property for the purpose of paying any special assessment for local improvements made under the provisions of this part 6 in the district, the county treasurer, having written authority from the board, may purchase any such property without paying for the same in cash and shall receive certificates of purchase therefor in the name of the county. The certificates shall be received and credited at their face value, with all interest and penalties accrued, on account of the assessments in pursuance of which the sale was made. The certificates may thereafter be sold by the county treasurer at their face value, with all interest and penalties accrued, and assigned by him to the purchaser in the name of the county. The proceeds of such sale shall be credited to the fund created by resolution for the payment of such assessments respectively. In the event that all bonded indebtedness incurred in payment for said local improvements has been discharged in full, said certificates may be sold by the board for the best price obtainable at public sale, at auction, or by sealed bids in the same manner and under the same conditions as is provided in subsection (4) of this section. The proceeds shall be credited to the general fund of said county. Such assignments shall be without recourse, and the sale and assignments shall operate as a lien in favor of the purchaser and assignee as is provided by law in the case of sale of real estate in default of payment of the general property tax.

Any county as such purchaser has the right to apply for tax deeds on such certificates of purchase at any time after three years from the date of issuance of said certificates, and such deeds shall be issued as provided by law for issuance of tax deeds for the nonpayment of the general property tax.

Cumulatively with all other remedies, any county which is the owner of property by virtue of a tax deed, or is the owner of property otherwise acquired, in satisfaction or discharge of the liens represented by such certificates of sale, may sell such property for the best price obtainable at public sale, at auction, or by sealed bids. Such sales shall be after public notice by the county treasurer or the county clerk and recorder to all persons having or claiming any interest in the property to be sold or in the proceeds of such sale by publication of such notice three times, a week apart, in a weekly or daily newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the property is located. Such notice shall describe the property and state the time, place, and manner of receiving bids; except that the time fixed for the sale shall not be less than ten days after the last publication. The county may reject any and all bids. Any interested party, at any time within ten days after the receipt of bids for the sale of property, may file with the county a written protest as to the sufficiency of the amount of any bid made or the validity of the proceedings for the sale. If the protest is denied, such person, within ten days thereafter, shall commence an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin or restrain the county from completing the sale. If no such action is commenced, all protests or objections to the sale shall be waived, and the county shall then convey the property to the successful bidder by quitclaim deed.

In addition to all other remedies, any county which is a holder of certificates of purchase may bring a civil action for foreclosure thereof in accordance with article 38 of title 38, C.R.S., joining as defendants all persons holding record title, persons occupying or in possession of the property, persons having or claiming any interest in the property or in the proceeds of foreclosure sale, all governmental taxing units having taxes or other claims against said property, and all unknown persons having or claiming any interest in said property. Any number of certificates may be foreclosed in the same proceeding. In such proceeding the county, as plaintiff, is entitled to all relief provided by law in actions for an adjudication of rights with respect to real property, including actions to quiet title.

The proceeds of any such sale of property shall be credited to the appropriate special assessment fund. The county shall deduct therefrom the necessary expenses in securing deeds and taking proceedings for the sale or foreclosure.

When any county has sold or conveyed at a fair market value certificates of purchase or property which it has acquired in satisfaction or discharge of special assessment liens, such sales and conveyances are hereby validated and confirmed as against all parties having or claiming any interest in such property or the proceeds of such sale.

It is hereby declared that the purpose of this section is to restore delinquent property to the tax rolls and to realize the greatest possible amount from such property for the benefit of all persons and taxing bodies having liens thereon.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 489, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-16.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1613, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1247, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 86:

(2) amended, p. 1059, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(5) amended, p. 81, § 2, effective March 26.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-616 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

Cross references:

For foreclosure proceedings by municipal corporations or taxing districts, see part 11 of article 25 of title 31; for sale of real estate in default of payment of the general property tax, see article 11 of title 39.

30-20-618. Power of board to contract debt - question submitted to voters.

The board shall have power to contract an indebtedness on behalf of the county, and upon the credit thereof, by borrowing money or issuing the negotiable interest-bearing bonds of the county for the purpose of providing a fund to pay such part of the cost of improvements authorized by this part 6 as may be determined by the board, subject, however, to constitutional limitations. No such debt shall be created for such purposes unless the question of incurring the same, including the question of the maximum net effective interest rate, shall be submitted at a special election, which election shall be called and conducted, the votes canvassed, and the result declared in the same manner as other county elections on questions of incurring bonded indebtedness.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 489, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-17.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1060, § 32, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-617 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.